Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0184.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 part 1 line-item appropriations Sec. 101. There is appropriated for various state departments and agencies, the judicial branch, and the legislative branch to supplement appropriations for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2025, from the following funds: APPROPRIATION SUMMARY 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Full-time equated classified positions 41.0 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 705,727,900 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 801,300 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 704,926,600 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 452,382,900 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 8,902,800 Total private revenues 750,000 Total other state restricted revenues 72,017,100 State general fund/general purpose $ 100,979,800 ARP HCBS match revenue ? state general fund/general purpose 54,894,000 Sec. 102. DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND RURAL DEVELOPMENT (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,000,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,000,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Total other state restricted revenues 1,000,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (2) FOOD SAFETY AND ANIMAL HEALTH Food safety and quality assurance $ 1,000,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,000,000 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Dairy and food safety fund 1,000,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 103. ATTORNEY GENERAL (1)    APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 62,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 62,000 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 0 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (2)    ATTORNEY GENERAL OPERATIONS Operations $ 62,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 62,000 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 IDG from MDSP, Michigan justice training fund 62,000 State general fund/general purpose 0 Sec. 104. CAPITAL OUTLAY (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 41,766,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 41,766,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 41,766,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (2) MICHIGAN NATURAL RESOURCES TRUST FUND Trust fund acquisition projects by priority: Lamberts Trail Park Acquisition, Kent County (grant-in-aid to City of Kentwood) (#24-0070) $ 129,100 Little Huron River Acquisition, Marquette County (#24-0179) 1,175,000 Munising Bay Overlook Acquisition, Alger County (grant-in-aid to City of Munising) (#24-0100) 619,000 City of Burton Community Park Acquisition, Genesee County (grant-in-aid to City of Burton) (#24-0128) 1,275,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Waterloo Recreation Area Addition, Jackson County (#24-0105) 1,000,000 Muskegon State Game Area Acquisition, Muskegon County (#24-0119) 595,000 Sturgeon River Sloughs Acquisition, Houghton County (#24-0120) 440,000 Michigamme Highlands Conservation Easement Acquisition, Marquette County (#24-0180) 4,200,000 Turtle Woods Nature Preserve Acquisition, Oakland County (grant-in-aid to Oakland County) (#24-0047) 2,175,000 Jefferson Wetland Preserve Acquisition, Macomb County (grant-in-aid to Chesterfield Township) (#24-0044) 560,000 Southeastern Michigan Regional Sprint Land Consolidation, Oakland County (#24-0117) 2,000,000 Jewel Golf Course Acquisition, Genesee County (grant-in-aid to City of Grand Blanc) (#24-0228) 1,500,000 Cornish State Game Area Acquisition, Van Buren County (#24-0118) 1,140,000 Man-Made Lake Parcel Acquisition, Manistee County (grant-in-aid to City of Manistee) (#24-0185) 94,000 Pinckney Recreation Area Addition, Livingston County (#24-0144) 1,300,000 Roberts Park Expansion Acquisition, Saginaw County (grant-in-aid to Thomas Township) (#24-0048) 48,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Main Street Park Project Acquisition, Washtenaw County (grant-in-aid to City of Chelsea) (#24-0080) 1,012,500 Trust fund development projects by priority: Bailey Park Restroom Facility, Calhoun County (grant-in-aid to City of Battle Creek) (#24-0024) 290,800 Lake Michigan Adventure Canopy Tour Addition, Muskegon County (#24-0140) 400,000 Riverfront Park Boat Launch Improvements, Berrien County (grant-in-aid to City of Buchanan) (#24-0129) 231,000 Rogue River Park Development, Kent County (grant-in-aid to Village of Sparta) (#24-0098) 281,400 Frances River Lot Improvements, Ingham County (grant-in-aid to City of Lansing) (#24-0013) 400,000 Two Rivers Park River Access, Kent County (grant-in-aid to Kent County) (#24-0173) 400,000 Johnson Park Development, Kent County (grant-in-aid to Kent County) (#24-0171) 400,000 Thompsonville Multi-Use Trailhead and Campground, Benzie County (grant-in-aid to Village of Thompsonville) (#24-0049) 276,600 Ottaway Crossing Footbridge, Grand Traverse County (grant-in-aid to Grand Traverse County) (#24-0096) 400,000 Mid Michigan Pathway Extension, Isabella County (grant-in-aid to City of Mt. Pleasant) (#24-0126) 400,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Rotary Park Pavilion and Fishing Dock, Branch County (grant-in-aid to City of Coldwater) (#24-0099) 400,000 Historic Bridge Park Accessibility Improvements, Calhoun County (grant-in-aid to Calhoun County) (#24-0043) 400,000 North Branch Park Boat Launch Renovation, Calhoun County (grant-in-aid to Calhoun County) (#24-0199) 222,000 Idema Explorers Trail Eastmanville Connector Project, Ottawa County (grant-in-aid to Ottawa County) (#24-0045) 400,000 Otterburn Park Infrastructure Improvements, Genesee County (grant-in-aid to City of Swartz Creek) (#24-0061) 290,000 Lincoln Township Beach Improvements, Berrien County (grant-in-aid to Lincoln Township) (#24-0077) 350,000 Mason County Picnic Area Trail and Trailhead Improvements, Mason County (grant-in-aid to Mason County) (#24-0139) 400,000 South Front Street Park Renovation, Cass County (grant-in-aid to City of Dowagiac) (#24-0082) 300,000 Oscoda Beach Park Boardwalk and Beach Access Improvements, Iosco County (grant-in-aid to Oscoda Township) (#24-0094) 400,000 Red Woolfe Park Improvements, Van Buren County (grant-in-aid to Village of Decatur) (#24-0110) 307,300 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 Lake Street Fishing Pier Development, Antrim County (grant-in-aid to Village of Central Lake) (#24-0124) 237,500 Swedetown Chalet Renovation and Trail Addition, Houghton County (grant-in-aid to Calumet Township) (#24-0150) 400,000 Heritage Trail Extension to Bewabic State Park, Iron County (grant-in-aid to Crystal Falls Township) (#24-0079) 215,000 Grand Traverse Greenway Development, Genesee County (#24-0103) 300,000 Detroit River Boating Access Site Renovation, Wayne County (#24-0109) 400,000 Springfield Memorial Park Improvements, Calhoun County (grant-in-aid to City of Springfield) (#24-0112) 257,500 Barnes Memorial Park Improvements, Wexford County (grant-in-aid to Colfax Township) (#24-0187) 224,000 Bike Park Development, Kent County (grant-in-aid to City of Grand Rapids) (#24-0010) 300,000 Steele Park Development, Ionia County (grant-in-aid to City of Ionia) (#24-0066) 400,000 Rondo Station Improvements, Kent County (grant-in-aid to City of Kentwood) (#24-0069) 300,000 Austin Lake Trail Project, Kalamazoo County (grant-in-aid to City of Portage) (#24-0081) 400,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Booth Park Entry and Trail Improvements, Oakland County (grant-in-aid to City of Birmingham) (#24-0122) 400,000 Whitefish Point State Harbor Redevelopment, Chippewa County (#24-0127) 400,000 Nakwema Trail Development, Charlevoix County (#24-0133) 400,000 Bronson Rail Trail, Branch County (grant-in-aid to City of Bronson) (#24-0155) 387,600 Platte River State Fish Hatchery Accessibility and Education, Benzie County (#24-0114) 400,000 Hartwick Pines Old Growth Exhibit Development, Crawford County (#24-0191) 400,000 Patterson Avenue and 76th Street Pathway Project, Kent County (grant-in-aid to Caledonia Township) (#24-0196) 400,000 Minard Mills Park Renovation, Jackson County (grant-in-aid to Jackson County) (#24-0037) 200,000 School Section Lake Bathhouse and Playground Renovation, Mecosta County (grant-in-aid to Mecosta County) (#24-0042) 400,000 Black River Bridge Replacement - High Country Pathway, Otsego County (#24-0141) 400,000 Intervale-Roselawn Playground - Joe Louis Greenway, Wayne County (grant-in-aid to City of Detroit) (#24-0146) 400,000 Clark Park - Joe Louis Greenway, Wayne County (grant-in-aid to City of Detroit) (#24-0147) 250,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Thurston Park Improvements - Kayak Launch, Antrim County (grant-in-aid to Village of Central Lake) (#24-0194) 193,700 Nature Park Kayak Launch, Genesee County (grant-in-aid to Flushing Township) (#24-0063) 207,200 Eddy Park Campground - Camper Shelters Project, Gogebic County (grant-in-aid to City of Wakefield) (#24-0008) 274,200 McQuisten Recreational Area Renovation, Alger County (grant-in-aid to Munising Township) (#24-0039) 300,000 Delta Mills Park to Hawk Meadow Park Pathway, Eaton County (grant-in-aid to Delta Township) (#24-0055) 400,000 Boyne City Park Improvements, Charlevoix County (grant-in-aid to City of Boyne City) (#24-0090) 322,000 3-Mile Trail Extension, Grand Traverse County (grant-in-aid to East Bay Township) (#24-0131) 400,000 Dixboro Road Pathway Connection, Washtenaw County (grant-in-aid to Ann Arbor Township) (#24-0152) 300,000 Winstrom Park Trails and Natural Area Improvements, Ottawa County (grant-in-aid to Park Township) (#24-0157) 326,700 Central Riverside Park Improvements, Ionia County (grant-in-aid to City of Belding) (#24-0211) 397,500 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Lewis Emery Park Development, Hillsdale County (grant-in-aid to Hillsdale County) (#24-0054) 255,500 Lake Huron Coastal Preserve - Accessibility Improvements, Iosco County (grant-in-aid to Alabaster Township) (#24-0059) 191,000 Pere Marquette Conservation Entry and Trail Project, Mason County (grant-in-aid to Pere Marquette Township) (#24-0174) 400,000 Mundy Miracle Commons Accessible Playscape and Improvements, Genesee County (grant-in-aid to Mundy Township) (#24-0198) 400,000 Ocqueoc Outdoor Center - Dock and Path Improvements, Presque Isle County (grant-in-aid to Presque Isle County) (#24-0091) 144,300 Boyle Lake Boating Access Site Improvements, Berrien County (#24-0116) 90,000 Crystal Waters State Game Area Access Development, Monroe County (#24-0028) 400,000 Mill Creek Park Enhancements, Washtenaw County (grant-in-aid to City of Dexter) (#24-0085) 400,000 Shaw Park Playground and Cricket Field, Macomb County (grant-in-aid to City of Warren) (#24-0020) 400,000 Grand Ledge Ball Park Improvements, Eaton County (grant-in-aid to City of Grand Ledge) (#24-0035) 346,500 Au Gres Riverfront Campground Improvements, Arenac County (grant-in-aid to City of Au Gres) (#24-0095) 400,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Eagle Harbor Beach Accessibility Project, Keweenaw County (grant-in-aid to Eagle Harbor Township) (#24-0123) 83,700 Marquette Greenway Development, Berrien County (grant-in-aid to New Buffalo Township) (#24-0218) 300,000 Lake Township Park Development, Roscommon County (grant-in-aid to Lake Township) (#24-0014) 400,000 Spindler Park Improvements, Macomb County (grant-in-aid to City of Eastpointe) (#24-0203) 350,400 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 41,766,000 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Michigan natural resources trust fund 41,766,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 105. DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENT, GREAT LAKES, AND ENERGY (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 156,223,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 156,223,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 140,741,200 Special revenue funds: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 15,325,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 156,800 (2) DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT Executive direction $ 130,559,400 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 130,559,400 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal funds 130,559,400 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (3) WATER RESOURCES DIVISION Great Lakes restoration initiative $ 7,561,800 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 7,561,800 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Infrastructure investment and jobs act fund 7,561,800 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (4) REMEDIATION AND REDEVELOPMENT DIVISION Contaminated site remediation and redevelopment programs $ 15,000,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 15,000,000 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Clean Michigan Initiative, response activities 15,000,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (5) MATERIALS MANAGEMENT DIVISION Energy programs $ 2,305,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 2,305,000 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Inflation reduction act 1,980,000 Special revenue funds: Energy efficiency and renewable energy revolving loan fund 325,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (6) ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Americorps and office of climate and energy $ 796,800 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 796,800 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal funds 640,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 156,800 Sec. 106. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated classified positions 41.0 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 330,840,300 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 727,200 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 330,113,100 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 183,146,700 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 8,902,800 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 4,655,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 78,514,600 ARP HCBS match revenue ? state general fund/general purpose 54,894,000 (2) DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT Property management $ 1,643,700 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,643,700 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Total other federal revenues 378,100 State general fund/general purpose $ 1,265,600 (3) CHILD SUPPORT ENFORCEMENT Child support enforcement operations $ 3,424,700 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 3,424,700 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Total other federal revenues 3,424,700 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (4) COMMUNITY SERVICES AND OUTREACH Community services block grant $ 11,330,600 Homeless programs 277,800 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 11,608,400 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Capped federal revenues 11,330,600 Total other federal revenues 277,800 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 (5) CHILDREN'S SERVICES AGENCY ? CHILD WELFARE Children trust Michigan $ 128,700 Foster care payments (3,193,800) GROSS APPROPRIATION $ (3,065,100) Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Total other federal revenues 128,700 State general fund/general purpose $ (3,193,800) (6) CHILDREN'S SERVICES AGENCY ? JUVENILE JUSTICE Full-time equated classified positions 41.0 Michigan youth treatment center--FTEs 70.0 $ 12,303,700 Shawono center--FTEs (29.0) (3,794,100) GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 8,509,600 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Capped federal revenues (45,300) Total other federal revenues (44,900) Special revenue funds: Local funds ? state share education funds (285,200) Local funds ? county chargeback (1,615,700) State general fund/general purpose $ 10,500,700 (7) DISABILITY DETERMINATION SERVICES Disability determination operations $ (1,643,700) GROSS APPROPRIATION $ (1,643,700) Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Total other federal revenues (1,478,200) 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 State general fund/general purpose $ (165,500) (8) BEHAVIORAL HEALTH PROGRAM ADMINISTRATION AND SPECIAL PROJECTS Community substance use disorder prevention, education, and treatment $ 565,800 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 565,800 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Total other state restricted revenues 565,800 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (9) BEHAVIORAL HEALTH SERVICES Health homes $ (178,700) Healthy Michigan plan ? behavioral health 12,840,000 Medicaid mental health services 57,069,800 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 69,731,100 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Total other federal revenues 61,909,800 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues (246,900) Total other state restricted revenues 68,200 State general fund/general purpose $ 8,000,000 (10) STATE PSYCHIATRIC HOSPITALS AND FORENSIC MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES Caro Regional Mental Health Center ? psychiatric hospital - adult $ 4,800,000 Center for forensic psychiatry 800,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Gifts and bequests for patient living and treatment environment (1,000,000) Gifts and bequests for patient living and treatment environment 1,000,000 Kalamazoo Psychiatric Hospital ? adult 2,600,000 Walter P. Reuther Psychiatric Hospital ? adult, children, and adolescents (4,200,000) GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 4,000,000 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Total other federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 4,000,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (11) HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES POLICY AND INITIATIVES Domestic violence prevention and treatment $ 893,800 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 893,800 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Capped federal revenues 893,800 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (12) EPIDEMIOLOGY, EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES, AND LABORATORY Emergency medical services program $ 750,000 Epidemiology administration 500,000 Laboratory services 1,227,200 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 2,477,200 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG from department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy 727,200 Federal revenues: Total other federal revenues 1,250,000 Special revenue funds: Total other state restricted revenues 500,000 State general fund/general purpose 0 (13) LOCAL HEALTH AND ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES Essential local public health services $ 5,000,000 Local health services 300,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 5,300,000 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Total other federal revenues 300,000 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 5,000,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (14) FAMILY HEALTH SERVICES Child and adolescent health care and centers $ 6,057,300 Dental programs 380,800 Immunization program (779,000) GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 5,659,100 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Total other federal revenues 380,800 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 6,057,300 Total other state restricted revenues (779,000) State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (15) CHILDREN'S SPECIAL HEALTH CARE SERVICES Bequests for care and services $ 300,000 Children's special health care services and administration 450,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 750,000 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Total other federal revenues 450,000 Special revenue funds: Total other state restricted revenues 300,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (16) AGING SERVICES Community services $ 0 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 0 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Total other federal revenues (221,600) State general fund/general purpose $ 221,600 (17) HEALTH AND AGING SERVICES ADMINISTRATION Health services administration $ 2,837,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 2,837,000 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Total other federal revenues 1,418,500 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 State general fund/general purpose $ 1,418,500 (18) HEALTH SERVICES Adult home help services 11,716,400 Federally qualified health centers $ (104,744,100) Health plan services 48,740,000 Healthy Michigan plan 23,904,100 Home health services 21,300 Hospital services and therapy 0 Integrated care organizations 4,210,300 Medicaid home- and community-based services waiver 10,937,000 Personal care services 199,200 Physician services 0 Transportation 0 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ (5,015,800) Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Total other federal revenues 29,135,800 State general fund/general purpose $ (34,151,600) (19) INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY Bridges information system $ 5,610,500 Information technology services and projects (5,610,500) GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 0 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Total other federal revenues 6,700 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues (6,700) 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (20) ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS ARP ? home and community-based services projects fund $ 54,894,000 ARP ? strengthening U.S. public health infrastructure, workforce, and data systems 9,962,900 Federal COVID emerging infections programs 2,688,500 Federal COVID epidemiology and laboratory capacity 61,000,000 State psych DSH disallowance 81,619,100 Health services grants 13,000,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 223,164,500 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Total other federal revenues 73,651,400 State general fund/general purpose $ 94,619,100 ARP HCBS match revenue ? state general fund/general purpose 54,894,000 Sec. 107. JUDICIARY (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 428,300 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 12,100 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 416,200 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 100,000 Special revenue funds: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 271,100 State general fund/general purpose $ 45,100 (2) SUPREME COURT Drug treatment courts $ 100,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 100,000 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: DOT, national highway traffic safety administration 100,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (3) JUSTICES' AND JUDGES' COMPENSATION Circuit court judges' state base salaries $ 202,500 Circuit court judicial salary standardization 68,600 Judges' retirement system defined contributions 24,400 OASI, Social Security 20,700 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 316,200 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Court fee fund 271,100 State general fund/general purpose $ 45,100 (4) ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Status offender pilot program $ 12,100 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 12,100 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 IDG from department of health and human services 12,100 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 108. DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND ECONOMIC OPPORTUNITY (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 130,240,400 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 130,240,400 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 111,840,400 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 2,500,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 15,900,000 (2) WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT Community and worker transition office $ 22,653,100 Michigan office of rural prosperity 350,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 23,003,100 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal funds 23,003,100 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (3) EMPLOYMENT SERVICES First responder presumed coverage claims $ 2,500,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 2,500,000 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: First responder presumed coverage fund 2,500,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (4) ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Community development block grant ? disaster recovery $ 43,570,000 Community enhancement grants 15,900,000 Michigan rehabilitation services 9,467,300 Michigan Works! skills scholarships (1,000,000) Michigan Works! skills scholarships 1,000,000 Transmission siting and economic development program 35,800,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 104,737,300 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: DED, vocational rehabilitation and independent living 9,467,300 Federal funds 35,800,000 HUD-CPD, community development block grant 43,570,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 15,900,000 Sec. 109. DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING AND REGULATORY AFFAIRS (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 3,053,600 Interdepartmental grant revenues: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 3,053,600 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 3,053,600 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (2) OCCUPATIONAL REGULATION Bureau of construction codes $ 3,053,600 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 3,053,600 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: DOE-OEERE, multiple grants 3,053,600 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 110. DEPARTMENT OF LIFELONG EDUCATION, ADVANCEMENT, AND POTENTIAL (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 750,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 750,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 750,000 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (2) OFFICE OF EARLY CHILDHOOD EDUCATION Office of great start operations $ 750,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 750,000 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Private foundations 750,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (3) ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS After school programming extension $ (300,000) After school programming extension 300,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 0 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 111. DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AND VETERANS AFFAIRS (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 0 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 0 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (2) CAPITAL OUTLAY MVFA ? land and acquisitions $ 4,526,200 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 4,526,200 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: USDVA-VHA 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 4,526,200 ?(3) MILITARY National guard tuition assistance fund $ (4,526,200) GROSS APPROPRIATION $ (4,526,200) Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ (4,526,200) Sec. 112. DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 26,030,700 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 26,030,700 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 3,917,500 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Total other state restricted revenues 21,500,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 613,200 (2) DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT Finance and operations $ 380,400 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 380,400 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal funds 380,400 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (3) COMMUNICATION AND CUSTOMER SERVICES Michigan historical center $ 209,300 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 209,300 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal funds 209,300 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (4) WILDLIFE MANAGEMENT Wildlife management $ 500,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 500,000 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Game and fish protection fund 500,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (5) FISHERIES MANAGEMENT Fisheries resources management $ 1,100,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,100,000 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Game and fish protection fund 1,100,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (6) FOREST RESOURCES DIVISION Forest management and timber market development $ 827,800 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 827,800 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal funds 827,800 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (7) RECREATIONAL LANDS AND INFRASTRUCTURE Dam infrastructure projects $ 2,500,000 Fisheries infrastructure 1,400,000 State game and wildlife infrastructure 1,000,000 State parks repair and maintenance 15,000,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 19,900,000 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Game and fish protection fund 4,900,000 Park improvement fund 15,000,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (8) ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Arctic Grayling fish passage $ 2,500,000 Decree negotiations 613,200 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 3,113,200 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal funds 2,500,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 613,200 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Sec. 113. DEPARTMENT OF STATE (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 9,583,500 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 9,583,500 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 9,583,500 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (2) ELECTION REGULATION Help America Vote Act $ 9,583,500 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 9,583,500 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Help America Vote Act ? election security 9,583,500 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 114. DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 100 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 100 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 100 (2) ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Northern Michigan disaster recovery $ 100 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 100 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 100 Sec. 115. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 5,750,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 5,750,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 5,750,000 (2) ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Critical infrastructure projects $ 5,750,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 5,750,000 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 5,750,000 Sec. 116. DEPARTMENT OF TREASURY (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 0 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 0 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (2) REVENUE SHARING City, village, and township revenue sharing $ (333,547,300) City, village, and township revenue sharing 333,547,300 County revenue sharing (291,111,400) County revenue sharing 291,111,400 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 0 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Sales tax 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (3) ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Local prosecutor support grants $ (16,750,000) Local prosecutor support grants 16,750,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 0 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 0 part 2 provisions concerning appropriations general sections Sec. 201. Pursuant to section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, total state spending from state sources under part 1 for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2025 is $242,890,900.00 and total state spending from state sources to be paid to local units of government is $36,976,000.00. The itemized statement below identifies appropriations from which spending to local units of government will occur: MICHIGAN NATURAL RESOURCES TRUST FUND Acquisition grants-in-aid $ 7,412,600 Development grants-in-aid 18,913,400 Subtotal $ 26,326,000 DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND ECONOMIC OPPORTUNITY Community enhancement grants $ 4,900,000 Subtotal $ 4,900,000 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION Critical infrastructure grants $ 5,750,000 Subtotal $ 5,750,000 DEPARTMENT OF TREASURY City, village, and township revenue sharing $ (333,547,300) 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 City, village, and township revenue sharing 333,547,300 County revenue sharing (291,111,400) County revenue sharing 291,111,400 Local prosecutor support grants (16,750,000) Local prosecutor support grants 16,750,000 Subtotal $ 0 TOTAL $ 36,976,000 Sec. 202. The appropriations made and expenditures authorized under this part and part 1 and the departments, commissions, boards, offices, and programs for which appropriations are made under this part and part 1 are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. Sec. 203. Funds appropriated in part 1 must be allocated and expended in a manner consistent with federal rules and regulations. Sec. 204. Funds appropriated in part 1 are subject to applicable federal audit and reporting requirements. Prompt action shall be taken if instances of noncompliance are identified, including noncompliance identified in an audit finding. If any instance of noncompliance is identified, including noncompliance identified in an audit finding, the state budget director shall take necessary and immediate action to rectify it. The state budget director shall notify the senate and house appropriations committees and the senate and house fiscal agencies when an instance of noncompliance is identified. Sec. 205. The state budget director shall report on the status of funds appropriated in part 1, and all funds appropriated related to the coronavirus relief effort, to the senate and house appropriations committees and the senate and house fiscal agencies on a monthly basis until all funds are exhausted. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 206. (1) For any grant program or project funded in part 1 intended for a single recipient organization or unit of local government, the grant program or project is for a public purpose and the department shall follow procurement statutes of this state, including any bidding requirements, unless the department can fully validate, through information detailed in this part or public supporting documents, both of the following: (a) The specific organization or unit of local government that will receive or administer the funds. (b) How the funds will be administered and expended. (2) To be eligible to receive a grant described in subsection (1), both of the following must occur: (a) A recipient must submit the application under subsection (3) not later than 60 days after the effective date of this act. (b) A recipient must be 1 of the following: (i) A unit of local government, as that term is defined in section 115 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1115. (ii) An institution of higher education. (iii) A state agency, as that term is defined in section 115 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1115. (iv) An entity registered with the department of licensing and regulatory affairs or the department of attorney general that has been in existence for at least the 12 months preceding the effective date of this act. (v) Another entity that can demonstrate, through state or federal tax filings or other state or federal government records, that it has been in existence for at least the 12 months preceding the effective date of this act. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (3) Notwithstanding any other conditions or requirements for direct appropriation grants, the department shall work with the state budget office to perform at least all of the following activities to administer the grants described in subsection (1): (a) Develop a standard application process using the electronic submission portal developed by the state budget office, grantee reporting requirements, and any other necessary documentation, including sponsorship information as specified under subsection (4). If the electronic submission portal identified in this subdivision is not fully functional by 60 days after the effective date of this act, the state budget office shall ensure that the standard application process and form are available promptly and paper submission is acceptable. The state budget office shall promptly submit application material received to the department for departmental review. (b) Establish a process to review, complete, and execute a grant agreement with a grant recipient. The department shall not execute a grant agreement unless all necessary documentation has been submitted and reviewed. (c) Verify to the extent possible that a grant recipient will use funds for a public purpose that serves the economic prosperity, health, safety, or general welfare of the residents of this state. (d) Review and verify all necessary information to ensure the grant recipient is reasonably able to execute the grant agreement, perform its fiduciary duty, and comply with all applicable state and federal statutes. The department may deduct the cost of background checks and any other efforts performed as part of this verification from the amount of the designated grant award. (e) Establish a standard timeline to review all documents 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 submitted by grant recipients and provide a response within 45 business days stating whether submitted documents by a grant recipient are sufficient or in need of additional information. If additional information is needed, the 60-day deadline in subsection (2) is considered to have been met if a sponsor has been identified for that grant. If a grant recipient does not provide information sufficient to execute a grant agreement not later than 60 days after being notified by the department of grant approval, the department shall return funds associated with the grant to the state treasury. (f) For the grant described under section 402, disburse 100% of the grant to the grant recipient not later than 60 days after a grant agreement has been executed. Disbursements must be consistent with part II, chapter 10, section 200 of the Financial Management Guide. (g) For grants other than those described in section 402, make an initial disbursement of up to 50% of the grant to the grant recipient not later than 60 days after a grant agreement has been executed. Disbursements must be consistent with part II, chapter 10, section 200 of the Financial Management Guide. (h) Disburse the funds remaining after the initial disbursement under subdivision (f) per the grant disbursement schedule in the executed grant agreement on a reimbursement basis after the grantee has provided sufficient documentation, as determined by the department, to verify that expenditures were made in accordance with the project purpose. (4) The process for the identification and sponsorship of a grant described in subsection (1) is as follows: (a) Not later than the effective date of this act, the state 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 budget office shall provide an initial list of grants that require legislative sponsorship to the legislature and shall make public an initial list of grants that likely will be sponsored by the department or by the state budget office. (b) A sponsor of a grant described in subsection (1) must be a legislator, the department, or the state budget office. (c) A legislative sponsor must be identified through a letter submitted by that legislator's office to the department and state budget director containing the name of the grant recipient, the intended amount of the grant, a certification from that legislator that the grant is for a public purpose, and specific citation of the section and subsection of the public act that authorizes the grant, as applicable. (d) Within 10 business days after the effective date of this act, the senate and house of representatives shall compile an initial list of legislative grant sponsors for their respective chambers and submit those compiled lists to the state budget office and the department, and the state budget office shall identify department- or state budget office-sponsored grants. The state budget director may grant an extension of this deadline of not more than 30 days on a case-by-case basis. The state budget office shall make the compiled lists public within 14 business days after the effective date of this act. (e) Not later than 60 days after the effective date of this act, the state budget office shall publish a final list of grants requiring sponsorship. If a legislative sponsor is not identified within 60 days after the effective date of this act, the department shall do 1 of the following: (i) Identify the department or the state budget office as the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 sponsor. (ii) Decline to execute the grant agreement and lapse the associated funds at the end of the fiscal year. (f) At any point during the fiscal year, legislative grant sponsors may be added to a grant request. (5) An executed grant agreement under this section between the department and a grant recipient must include at least all of the following: (a) All necessary identifying information for the grant recipient, including any tax and financial information for the department to administer funds under this section. (b) A description of the project for which the grant funds will be expended, including tentative timelines and the estimated budget. The department shall not reimburse expenditures that are outside of the project purpose, as stated in the executed grant agreement, from appropriations in part 1. The grantee shall return to the treasury any interest in excess of $1,000.00 earned on the grant funds while unexpended and in possession of the grantee. (c) Unless otherwise specified in department policy, a requirement that funds appropriated for the grants described in subsection (1) may be used only for expenditures that occur on or after the effective date of this act. (d) A requirement for reporting by the grant recipient to the department and the legislative sponsor that provides the status of the project and an accounting of all funds expended by the grant recipient, as determined by the department. (e) A claw-back provision that allows the department of treasury to recoup or otherwise collect any funds that are declined, unspent, or otherwise misused. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (f) The signed legislative sponsorship letter required under subsection (4), incorporated into the grant agreement and included as an appendix or attachment. (g) If a grant recipient has provided information sufficient to execute a grant agreement, the state budget office shall promptly transmit that information to the department for the department's review of the grant application. If a grant recipient has provided information sufficient to execute a grant agreement within 60 days after the effective date of this act, but the grant application needs technical fixes or additional legislative action, as identified by the state budget office, the 60-day deadline in this subdivision is considered to have been met, if a sponsor has been identified for that grant. If a grant recipient does not provide information sufficient to execute a grant agreement not later than 60 days after being notified by the department of grant approval, the department shall return funds associated with the grant to the state treasury. (6) If appropriate to improve the administration or oversight of a grant described in subsection (1), the department may adopt a memorandum of understanding with another state department to perform the required duties under this section. (7) A grant recipient shall respond to all reasonable information requests from the department related to grant expenditures and retain grant records for not less than 7 years, and the grant may be subject to monitoring, site visits, and audits as determined by the department. The grant agreement required under this section must include signed assurance by the chief executive officer or other executive officer of the grant recipient that the requirements of this subsection will be met. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (8) The grant recipient shall expend all funds awarded and complete all projects not later than September 30, 2029. If at that time any unexpended funds remain, the grant recipient shall return those funds to the state treasury. (9) Any funds that are granted to a state department are appropriated in that department for the purpose of the intended grant. (10) The state budget director may, on a case-by-case basis, extend the deadline in subsection (8) on request by a grant recipient if a sponsor has been identified for the grant. The state budget director shall notify the chairs of the senate and house of representatives appropriations committees not later than 5 days after an extension is granted. (11) By March 1 of the current fiscal year, the state budget office shall post a report in a publicly accessible location on its website. The report must list the grant recipient, project purpose, and location of the project for each grant described in subsection (1), the status of funds allocated and disbursed under the grant agreement, and the legislative sponsor, if applicable. After March 1, the state budget office shall update the report monthly and shall post the updated report each month. The state budget office shall include in the report the most comprehensive information the office has available at the time of posting for grants awarded. The state budget office may compile the information required in this report across all departments. The department shall assist the state budget office with the compilation of the report required under this subsection. (12) On request, beginning 75 days after the effective date of this act, the state budget office shall release information 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 received for grant applications. (13) As applicable, the legislative sponsor of a grant described in subsection (1) shall not sponsor a grant, or ask another legislator to sponsor a grant, if there is a conflict of interest related to the grant recipient. (14) If the department reasonably determines that the funds allocated for an executed grant agreement under this section were misused or that use of the funds was misrepresented by the grant recipient, the department shall not award any additional funds under the executed grant agreement and shall refer the grant for review following internal audit protocols. Sec. 207. As a condition of receiving funds under section 401, 402, 601, 602, 603, 604, 605, 606, 607, 608, 609, or 701, a grant recipient must agree to decline, not apply for, or not in any other way receive any funds the grant recipient may otherwise qualify for under section 517, 1019, 1050a, 1050b, 1051, 1053a, 1053b, or 1054 of article 9 of 2024 PA 121, if the funds appropriated under those sections of 2024 PA 121 were appropriated for a substantially similar purpose as the purposes described under section 401, 402, 601, 602, 603, 604, 605, 606, 607, 608, 609, or 701. CAPITAL OUTLAY Sec. 301. (1) The department of natural resources shall enter into agreements with local units of government to administer the grants identified in part 1. The agreements must at least require that grant recipients do all of the following, the agreements must require that grant recipients do all of the following: (a) Dedicate to public outdoor recreation uses in perpetuity the land acquired or developed. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (b) Replace lands converted or lost to other than public outdoor recreation use. (c) For parcels acquired that are larger than 5 acres, provide this state with a nonparticipating 1/6 minimum royalty interest in any acquired minerals that are retained by the grant recipient. (2) The agreements under subsection (1) must also provide that the full payments of grants be made only after proof of acquisition, or proof of completion of a development project, is submitted by the grant recipient and all costs are verified by the department of natural resources. This requirement may be waived by the department of natural resources. Sec. 302. The appropriations in part 1 for capital outlay shall be carried forward at the end of the fiscal year consistent with the provisions of section 248 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1248. Sec. 303. (1) The state share of the capital outlay appropriations authorized in 2022 PA 151 for the following Michigan natural resources trust fund projects that have since been withdrawn by the grantee is reduced up to the amount indicated and the money lapsed to the Michigan natural resources trust fund: Skyline Recreation Area - Inholding Acquisition, Emmet County (grant-in-aid to City of Petoskey) (#21-0108) $ 187,500 Midland-Freeland Path Connector Acquisition, Saginaw County (grant-in-aid to Tittabawassee Township) (#21-0080) $ 71,300 (2) The state share of the capital outlay appropriation authorized in 2023 PA 119 for the following Michigan natural resources trust fund project that has since been withdrawn by the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 grantee is reduced up to the amount indicated and the money lapsed to the Michigan natural resources trust fund: Crow Island State Game Area addition, Bay County (#22-0135) $ 1,300,000 (3) The state share of the capital outlay appropriation authorized in 2024 PA 135 for the following Michigan natural resources trust fund project that has since been withdrawn by the grantee is reduced up to the amount indicated and the money lapsed to the Michigan natural resources trust fund: Johnson Nature Center Preserve Expansion, Oakland County (grant-in-aid to Bloomfield Hills Schools) (#23-0184) $ 890,000 (4) Any money lapsed under subsection (1), (2), or (3) is available for reappropriation. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES Sec. 402. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for health services grants, $13,000,000.00 must be awarded to a nonprofit Michigan health care system organized under the laws of this state that is exempt from federal income tax under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of 1986, 26 USC 501, that is located in a county with a population between 25,400 and 25,800 according to the most recent federal decennial census and in a city with a population between 4,500 and 5,000 according to the most recent federal decennial census for the purpose of renovating an existing emergency department to support mental health intake. This may include, but is not limited to, emergency unit safe rooms for behavioral health patients and an emergency psychiatric assessment, treatment, and healing (EmPATH) unit. Any established EmPATH unit 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 shall provide immediate access to an emergency psychiatrist, and staff shall be trained for the needs of EmPATH unit patients. Sec. 403. The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for ARP - strengthening U.S. public health infrastructure, workforce, and data systems are designated as a work project appropriation, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditures for projects under this section until the projects have been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is to improve the efficiency and capabilities of public health administration and data visualization systems. (b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state employees or contracts. (c) The total estimated cost of the project is $9,962,900.00. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2029. Sec. 404. The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for federal COVID emerging infections programs are designated as a work project appropriation, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditures for projects under this section until the projects have been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is to modernize public health research and laboratory surveillance activities and support staffing and operational costs for the emerging infections programs. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state employees or contracts. (c) The total estimated cost of the project is $2,688,500.00. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2029. Sec. 405. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for federal COVID epidemiology and laboratory capacity, the department shall expend $61,000,000.00 in federal funds for Epidemiology and Laboratory Capacity for Infectious Diseases (ELC). (2) The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for federal COVID epidemiology and laboratory capacity are designated as a work project appropriation. Unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditures under this section until the project has been completed. All of the following are in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is to assist with infectious diseases epidemiology and laboratory capacity. (b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state employees or contracts. (c) The estimated cost of the project is $61,000,000.00. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2029. Sec. 406. The ARP HCBS match revenue - state general fund/general purpose appropriated in part 1 for ARP - home- and community-based services projects fund shall be deposited into the ARP - home-and community-based services projects fund. Sec. 407. (1) the department may accept monetary and nonmonetary gifts, bequests, donations, contributions, or grants from any private source to support, in whole or in part, a departmental function or program. The department shall expend or 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 use such gifts, bequests, donations, contributions, or grants for the purposes designated by the private source, if the purpose is specified. (2) Revenue collected by the department and amounts remaining in the fund under this section that is unexpended and unencumbered must not lapse to the general fund but must be carried forward to the subsequent fiscal year. (3) Private revenues received under this section that exceed the appropriations in part 1 are appropriated and may be received and expended by the department for the purposes for which the funds are received. (4) If additional authorization is approved in SIGMA by the state budget office under this section, the department shall notify the subcommittees and the senate and house fiscal agencies within 10 days after the approval. The notification must include the amount and funding source of the additional authorization, the date of the approval, and the projected use of the funds to be expended. JUDICIARY Sec. 501. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for status offender pilot program, the state court administrative office, under the direction and supervision of the supreme court, shall establish a grant program to award 5 eligible courts with grants for innovative, community-based diversion programs and services that work solely with youth for whom the court receives a complaint, referral, or petition for what is alleged to be a status offense. The state court administrative office may partner with the Michigan department of health and human services and the Michigan committee on juvenile justice to identify and award grants to up to 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 5 Michigan courts. (2) The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for the status offender pilot program are designated as a work project appropriation. Unencumbered or unallotted funds must not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditures under this section until the project has been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is for selected courts to divert youth charged or alleged to have committed a status offense away from the juvenile court system. (b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state employees, contracts with service providers, or both. (c) The total estimated cost of the project is $512,100.00. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2026. DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND ECONOMIC OPPORTUNITY Sec. 601. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for community enhancement grants, $1,000,000.00 shall be awarded to a city with a population between 3,500 and 4,000 in a county with a population between 68,000 and 69,000 according to the most recent federal decennial census to support property improvements to a railway history museum. Sec. 602. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for community enhancement grants, $1,000,000.00 must be awarded to a cultural exchange network to support a diversity, music, and arts festival that is free to the public and located in a city with a population over 600,000 according to the most recent federal decennial census. Sec. 603. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for community 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 enhancement grants, $1,000,000.00 shall be awarded to a city with a population between 10,000 and 10,500 in a county with a population greater than 1,500,000 according to the most recent federal decennial census to support a seawall project. Sec. 604. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for community enhancement grants, $3,000,000.00 shall be awarded to a life center located in a city with a population between 81,000 and 82,000 in a county with a population between 400,000 and 500,000 according to the most recent federal decennial census to support infrastructure improvements at the center or another facility owned or operated by the center. Sec. 605. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for community enhancement grants, $4,000,000.00 must be awarded to a nonprofit security organization located in a charter township with a population between 44,000 and 45,000 and in a county with a population between 1,200,000 and 1,300,000 according to the most recent federal decennial census to implement community safety measures. Sec. 606. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for community enhancement grants, $1,900,000.00 must be awarded to a city with a population greater than 10,000 that is located within a county with a population between 32,000 and 34,000 according to the most recent federal decennial census. Funds must be used for permanent or temporary repairs to a failed culvert system, as well as other repairs that are necessary due to failure of the culvert system. Sec. 607. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for community enhancement grants, the department shall allocate $3,000,000.00 to a nonprofit corporation that has been dedicated to fostering equity, investment, and wealth generation that directly impacts 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 neighborhoods, communities, and the people who call Detroit and Michigan home for a new multi-use housing project on a parcel of land that is more than 0.05 acre and less than 0.07 acre located in a city with a population greater than 600,000 according to the most recent federal decennial census. Sec. 609. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for community enhancement grants, $1,000,000.00 shall be awarded to a county with a population between 370,000 and 375,000 according to the most recent federal decennial census for road improvements. Sec. 610. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 for Michigan Works! skills scholarship must be made available to Michigan works agencies to provide residents of this state with tuition assistance to obtain an industry-recognized credential or certification in a high-demand occupation that aligns with this state's goal of increasing the percentage of working-age adults with a skill certificate or college degree to 60% by 2030. (2) In order to qualify for tuition assistance under this section, an individual must satisfy all of the following requirements: (a) Be a resident of this state. (b) Be 21 years of age or older. (c) Be a United States citizen or an alien qualified to receive public benefits. (d) Be 1 of the following: (i) An asset limited income constrained employee. (ii) Unemployed. (iii) Underemployed. (iv) A dislocated worker. (v) An adult receiving public assistance. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (vi) An adult in need of a high school diploma or equivalent. (vii) An adult living in a distressed community or an opportunity zone. (viii) A member of another underrepresented population. (3) A Michigan works agency who receives funding under this subsection shall provide necessary reporting data to the department of labor and economic opportunity in alignment with the federal workforce innovation and opportunity act reporting requirements. (4) It is the intent of the legislature that the industry-recognized credentials received in conjunction with this subsection are intended to lead to employment at or above the asset limited, income constrained, employed level for the county in which the resident lives. (5) A Michigan works agency that receives funding under this section shall work with the department of labor and economic opportunity to provide information and coordinate on how these funds work with other Michigan reconnect-eligible credential programs to ensure that applicants are aware of all their training options and that the program is not duplicative of other training programs. Sec. 611. The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for community development block grant - disaster recovery are designated as a work project appropriation, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditures for projects under this section until the projects have been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the work project is to support disaster 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 recovery and resiliency efforts. (b) The projects will be accomplished by utilizing state employees or contracts with service providers, or both. (c) The total estimated cost of the work project is $43,570,000.00. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2029. Sec. 612. The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for the Michigan office of rural prosperity are designated as a work project appropriation, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditures for projects under this section until the projects have been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the work project is to provide grants in support of community facility projects in rural communities. (b) The projects will be accomplished by utilizing state employees or contracts with service providers, or both. (c) The total estimated cost of the work project is $350,000.00. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2029. Sec. 613. The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for the community and worker economic transition office are designated as a work project appropriation, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditures for projects under this section until the projects have been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (a) The purpose of the work project is to provide grants to auto suppliers that are going through an industry transition. (b) The projects will be accomplished by utilizing state employees or contracts with service providers, or both. (c) The total estimated cost of the work project is $22,653,100.00. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2029. Sec. 614. The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for the transmission siting and economic development program are designated as a work project appropriation, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditures for projects under this section until the projects have been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the work project is to establish apprenticeship programs for the utility industry, provide for weatherization of homes, and develop and leverage existing training programs for energy infrastructure workers. (b) The projects will be accomplished by utilizing state employees or contracts with service providers, or both. (c) The total estimated cost of the work project is $35,800,000.00. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2029. DEPARTMENT OF LIFELONG EDUCATION, ADVANCEMENT, AND POTENTIAL Sec. 701. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for after school programming extension, the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall allocate $300,000.00 to a 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 nonprofit located in a city with a population between 61,000 and 62,000 according to the most recent federal decennial census that lowers barriers to postsecondary education for disadvantaged youth, and that works with local program affiliates in different regions of the state. (2) Any unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for after school programming extension are designated as a work project appropriation, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditures to sustain a program that lowers postsecondary access barriers for disadvantaged youth until the expiration date of this work project as stated in subdivision (d). The following are in compliance with section 451a(1) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is to lower barriers to postsecondary education for disadvantaged youth for the duration of the work project. (b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state employees or contracts with service providers, or both. (c) The estimated cost of the project is $300,000.00. (d) The completion date of the project is September 30, 2028. DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES Sec. 801. The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for Arctic Grayling fish passage are designated as a work project appropriation, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditure for the project under this section until the project has been completed. The following is in compliance with section 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is to replace road-stream crossings on state forest lands. (b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state employees, contracts, or grants. (c) The total estimated cost of the project is $2,500,000.00. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2028. Sec. 802. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department may increase capacity by a total of 9.0 FTE positions, for a limited term, to facilitate the installation of high-speed internet infrastructure upon department-managed lands. DEPARTMENT OF STATE Sec. 901. The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for help America vote act are designated as a work project appropriation, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditure of election security initiatives in accordance with acts that include, but may not be limited to, the consolidated appropriations act, 2020, Public Law 116-93, and the further consolidated appropriations act, 2024, Public Law 118-47, as authorized in section 101 of the help America vote act of 2002, 52 USC 20901, and any other applicable federal and state rules and regulations. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is to support election security initiatives, which include, but are not limited to, election equipment upgrades, security and testing of voting systems, and election operation enhancements. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state employees or contracts with service providers, or both. (c) The total estimated cost of the project is $9,583,500.00. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2029. DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE Sec. 1001. (1) Federal revenues authorized by and available from the federal government in excess of the appropriations in part 1 that are not otherwise authorized under section 1002 are appropriated and may be received and expended by the department for purposes authorized under state law and subject to federal requirements. The total amount of federal revenues that may be received and expended under this section must not exceed $15,000,000.00. (2) The department shall notify the subcommittees and the senate and house fiscal agencies before expending federal revenues received and appropriated under subsection (1). (3) If additional authorization is approved in SIGMA by the state budget office under this section, the department shall notify the subcommittees and the senate and house fiscal agencies within 10 days after the approval. The notification must include the amount and funding source of the additional authorization, the date of its approval, and the projected use of the funds to be expended. Sec. 1002. (1) The department may receive and expend money from local, private, federal, or state sources for the purpose of providing emergency management training to local or private interests and for the purpose of supporting emergency preparedness, response, recovery, and mitigation activity. If additional expenditure authorization in SIGMA is approved by the state budget 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 office under this section, the department and the state budget office shall notify the subcommittees and the senate and house fiscal agencies within 10 days after the approval. The notification must include the amount and source of the additional authorization, the date of its approval, and the projected use of the funds to be expended under the authorization. (2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated from the disaster and emergency contingency fund an amount necessary to cover costs related to any disaster or emergency as defined in the emergency management act, 1976 PA 390, MCL 30.401 to 30.421. Funds must be expended as provided under sections 18 and 19 of the emergency management act, 1976 PA 390, MCL 30.418 and 30.419, and R 30.51 to R 30.61 of the Michigan Administrative Code. (3) If, in a particular month, expenditures are made from the disaster and emergency contingency fund, the department shall submit a report for that month to the senate and house fiscal agencies detailing the purpose of the expenditures. The monthly report required under this subsection must be submitted within 30 days after the end of the month during which funds from the disaster and emergency contingency fund were expended. (4) The department shall track and report on a biannual basis, as provided in section 224 of article 14 of 2024 PA 121, the status of the department's assessment of critical infrastructure vulnerabilities, including the protection status of critical infrastructure items identified by the assessment. The department is not required to report any information that could compromise the security of any critical infrastructure. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION Sec. 1101. The department may hire up to 2.0 FTEs to support the implementation of various aeronautics programs included in 2023 PA 119 and 2024 PA 121. Sec. 1102. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for critical infrastructure projects, $750,000.00 must be allocated to a township with a population between 30,000 and 31,000 according to the latest federal decennial census in a county with a population greater than 1,700,000 according to the latest federal decennial census for intersection safety improvements. Sec. 1103. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for critical infrastructure projects, $5,000,000.00 must be allocated to a county with a population greater than 1,700,000 according to the most recent decennial census for a rail grade separation project. DEPARTMENT OF TREASURY Sec. 1201. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for local prosecutor support grants, the department of treasury shall award grants to eligible offices of county prosecutors to reduce the average caseload per attorney. An office of a county prosecutor is eligible for a grant if the office meets all of the following requirements: (a) The office of a county prosecutor must receive at a minimum the same amount of funding from the county for the county's 2025 fiscal year as the office of a county prosecutor received from the county in the immediately preceding fiscal year. (b) The county is 1 of the top 15 counties with the highest violent crime rate per 1,000 residents as determined for each county. The violent crime rate is calculated by first dividing the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 number described in subparagraph (i) by the number described in subparagraph (ii) and then multiplying the result by 1,000, as follows: (i) The total violent crime incidents reported for the county according to the most recent annual crime report prepared by the department of state police that is available as of April 1 of the immediately preceding state fiscal year. (ii) The total population of the county according to the most recent federal decennial census. (c) The office of a county prosecutor must apply for a grant in a form and manner as determined by the department of treasury. The office of a county prosecutor must include with its application a proposed budget designating that grant proceeds will only be used to support costs that reduce the average caseload per attorney. (d) The office of a county prosecutor submits a report that includes, at a minimum, the current number of staff, the average caseload per attorney, and the local funding that supports the office of the county prosecutor for both fiscal year 2025 and the preceding fiscal year. (2) The amount of the grant to each office of a county prosecutor must be the greater of either of the following and that amount must be adjusted in accordance with subsection (3) or (4) as needed in order to expend the full appropriated amount in part 1 for the local prosecutor support grants: (a) The amount received under section 991 of article 5 of 2023 PA 119. (b) An amount equal to the product of $7.50 multiplied by the population of the county in which the office of the county prosecutor is located, according to the most recent federal 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 decennial census. (3) If any grant funding remains after determining the initial grant award amounts under subsection (2), the remaining funding must be distributed among the offices of county prosecutors that received a grant under subsection (1) on a per capita basis determined by the population of the county in which the office of the county prosecutor is located, according to the most recent federal decennial census. (4) If the total amount appropriated for the local prosecutor support grants does not support the full grant amounts determined under subsection (2), then the grant amount determined under subsection (2) for each office of a county prosecutor that meets all of the requirements of subsection (1) shall be reduced on a per capita basis determined by the population of the county in which the office of the county prosecutor is located, according to the most recent federal decennial census. (5) The department shall not use any of the funds appropriated under this section for administration. (6) Not later than August 1, the department shall submit a report to the house and senate appropriations committees, the house and senate fiscal agencies, and the state budget director that includes all of the following: (a) A list of all of the offices of a county prosecutor that received a grant under this section. (b) The information required under subsection (1)(d). (c) The initial amount awarded to each office of a county prosecutor under subsection (2) not adjusted for any adjustments under subsection (3) or (4). (d) The additional amount awarded under subsection (3) for 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 each office of a county prosecutor. (e) The amount reduced under subsection (4) for each office of a county prosecutor. (f) The total amount awarded to each office of a county prosecutor under this section. Sec. 1202. Revenue from the tobacco products tax act, 1993 PA 327, MCL 205.421 to 205.436, related to counties with a population of more than 2,000,000 according to the 2000 federal decennial census is appropriated and must be distributed in accordance with section 12(2)(e) of the tobacco products tax act, 1993 PA 327, MCL 205.432. Sec. 1203. (1) The funds appropriated in part 1 for city, village, and township revenue sharing are for grants to cities, villages, and townships and must be distributed as provided in this section. (2) From the first $299,126,400.00 appropriated in part 1 for city, village, and township revenue sharing, each city, village, or township shall receive an amount equal to 100.0% of the revenue sharing payment for which the city, village, or township would have been eligible to receive under section 952 of article 5 of 2023 PA 119, rounded to the nearest dollar, regardless of whether any limitation or eligibility criteria under section 952 of article 5 of 2023 PA 119 were satisfied. (3) The remaining amount appropriated in part 1 for city, village, and township revenue sharing after the distributions under subsection (2) must be distributed as follows: (a) 1/3 shall be distributed as taxable value payments as provided under subsection (4). (b) 1/3 must be distributed as unit type population payments 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 as provided under subsection (5). (c) 1/3 must be distributed as yield equalization payments as provided under subsection (6). (4) A taxable value payment must be made to each city, village, and township, determined as follows: (a) Determine the per capita taxable value for each city, village, and township by dividing the taxable value of that city, village, or township by the population of that city, village, or township. (b) Determine the statewide per capita taxable value by dividing the total taxable value of all cities, villages, and townships by the total population of all cities, villages, and townships. (c) Determine the per capita taxable value ratio for each city, village, and township by dividing the statewide per capita taxable value by the per capita taxable value for that city, village, or township. (d) Determine the adjusted taxable value population for each city, village, and township by multiplying the per capita taxable value ratio as determined under subdivision (c) for that city, village, or township by the population of that city, village, or township. (e) Determine the total statewide adjusted taxable value population, which is the sum of all adjusted taxable value populations for all cities, villages, and townships. (f) Determine the taxable value payment rate by dividing the amount to be distributed under this subsection by the total statewide adjusted taxable value population as determined under subdivision (e). 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 (g) Determine the taxable value payment for each city, village, and township by multiplying the result under subdivision (f) by the adjusted taxable value population for that city, village, or township. (5) A unit type population payment must be made to each city, village, and township, determined as follows: (a) Determine the unit type population weight factor for each city, village, and township as follows: (i) For a township with a population of 5,000 or less, 1.0. (ii) For a township with a population of more than 5,000 but less than 10,001, 1.2. (iii) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (xix), for a township with a population of more than 10,000 but less than 20,001, 1.44. (iv) For a township with a population of more than 20,000 but less than 40,001, 4.32. (v) For a township with a population of more than 40,000 but less than 80,001, 5.18. (vi) For a township with a population of more than 80,000, 6.22. (vii) For a village with a population of 5,000 or less, 1.5. (viii) For a village with a population of more than 5,000 but less than 10,001, 1.8. (ix) For a village with a population of more than 10,000, 2.16. (x) For a city with a population of 5,000 or less, 2.5. (xi) For a city with a population of more than 5,000 but less than 10,001, 3.0. (xii) For a city with a population of more than 10,000 but less 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 than 20,001, 3.6. (xiii) For a city with a population of more than 20,000 but less than 40,001, 4.32. (xiv) For a city with a population of more than 40,000 but less than 80,001, 5.18. (xv) For a city with a population of more than 80,000 but less than 160,001, 6.22. (xvi) For a city with a population of more than 160,000 but less than 320,001, 7.46. (xvii) For a city with a population of more than 320,000 but less than 640,001, 8.96. (xviii) For a city with a population of more than 640,000, 10.75. (xix) For a township that has a population of not less than 10,000 and provides documentation to the department of treasury that the township provides for or makes available all of the following, the unit type population weight factor for a city with the same population: (A) Fire services. (B) Police services on a 24-hour basis either through contracting for or directly employing personnel. (C) Water services to 50% or more of its residents. (D) Sewer services to 50% or more of its residents. (b) Determine the adjusted unit type population for each city, village, and township by multiplying the unit type population weight factor for that city, village, or township as determined under subdivision (a) by the population of the city, village, or township. (c) Determine the total statewide adjusted unit type 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 population, which is the sum of the adjusted unit type population for all cities, villages, and townships. (d) Determine the unit type population payment rate by dividing the amount to be distributed under this subsection by the total statewide adjusted unit type population as determined under subdivision (c). (e) Determine the unit type population payment for each city, village, and township by multiplying the result under subdivision (d) by the adjusted unit type population for that city, village, or township. (6) A yield equalization payment must be made to each city, village, and township in an amount that is sufficient to provide the guaranteed tax base for a local tax effort, but not to exceed 0.02. The payment must be determined as follows: (a) The guaranteed tax base is the maximum combined state and local per capita taxable value that can be guaranteed in a state fiscal year to each city, village, and township for a local tax effort, not to exceed 0.02, if an amount equal to the amount described in subsection (3)(c) is distributed to cities, villages, and townships whose per capita taxable value is below the guaranteed tax base. (b) The full yield equalization payment to each city, village, and township is the product of the amounts determined under subparagraphs (i) and (ii): (i) An amount greater than zero that is equal to the difference between the guaranteed tax base determined in subdivision (a) and the per capita taxable value of the city, village, or township. (ii) The local tax effort of the city, village, or township, not to exceed 0.02, multiplied by the population of that city, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 village, or township. (7) For purposes of this section, any city, village, or township that completely merges with another city, village, or township must be treated as a single entity, so that when determining the eligible city, village, and township revenue sharing payment under section 952 of article 5 of 2023 PA 119 for the combined single entity, the city, village, and township revenue sharing amount that each of the merging local units of government was eligible to receive under section 952 of article 5 of 2023 PA 119 is summed. Sec. 1204. (1) Cities, villages, and townships receiving a payment under section 1203(2) and counties receiving a payment under section 1205(2) shall receive 1/6 of their total payment on the last business day of October, December, February, April, June, and August. On the last business day of February 2025, cities, villages, and townships receiving a payment under section 1203(3) and counties receiving a payment under section 1205(3) shall receive 50% of the estimated payment to be received under section 1203(3) or 1205(3), as applicable. On the last business day of June 2025, cities, villages, and townships receiving a payment under section 1203(3) and counties receiving a payment under section 1205(3) shall receive any remaining payment calculated under section 1203(3) or 1205(3), as applicable. (2) Payments distributed under section 1203 or 1205 may be withheld in accordance with sections 17a and 21 of the Glenn Steil state revenue sharing act of 1971, 1971 PA 140, MCL 141.917a and 141.921. (3) If a city, village, or township that receives a payment under section 1203 is determined to have a retirement pension 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 benefit system in underfunded status under section 5 of the protecting local government retirement and benefits act, 2017 PA 202, MCL 38.2805, the city, village, or township must allocate to its pension unfunded liability an amount equal to 50% of the difference between its current year payment under section 1203 and the amount the city, village or township would have been eligible to receive under section 952 of article 5 of 2023 PA 119, rounded to the nearest dollar, regardless of whether any limitation or eligibility criteria under section 952 of article 5 of 2023 PA 119 were satisfied. A city, village, or township that has issued a municipal security under section 518 of the revised municipal finance act, 2001 PA 34, MCL 141.2518, is exempt from this requirement. (4) If a county that receives a payment under section 1205 is determined to have a retirement pension benefit system in underfunded status under section 5 of the protecting local government retirement and benefits act, 2017 PA 202, MCL 38.2805, the county must allocate to its pension unfunded liability an amount equal to 50% of the difference between its current year payment under section 1205 and the amount the county would have been eligible to receive under section 955 and section 952(3) of article 5 of 2023 PA 119, rounded to the nearest dollar, regardless of whether any limitation or eligibility criteria under section 955 of article 5 of 2023 PA 119 were satisfied. A county that has issued a municipal security under section 518 of the revised municipal finance act, 2001 PA 34, MCL 141.2518, is exempt from this requirement. Sec. 1205. (1) The funds appropriated in part 1 for county revenue sharing are for grants to counties and must be distributed 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 as provided in this section. (2) From the first $261,069,700.00 appropriated in part 1, each county shall receive an amount equal to 100.0% of the revenue sharing payment for which the county would have been eligible to receive under section 955 and section 952(3) of article 5 of 2023 PA 119, rounded to the nearest dollar, regardless of whether any limitation or eligibility criteria under sections 952 and 955 of article 5 of 2023 PA 119 were satisfied. (3) From the remaining amount appropriated in part 1 for county revenue sharing after the distributions under subsection (2), a taxable value payment must be made to each county, determined as follows: (a) Determine the per capita taxable value for each county by dividing the taxable value of that county by the population of that county. (b) Determine the statewide per capita taxable value by dividing the total taxable value of all counties by the total population of all counties. (c) Determine the per capita taxable value ratio for each county by dividing the statewide per capita taxable value by the per capita taxable value for that county. (d) Determine the adjusted taxable value population for each county by multiplying the per capita taxable value ratio as determined under subdivision (c) for that county by the population of that county. (e) Determine the total statewide adjusted taxable value population, which is the sum of all adjusted taxable value population for all counties. (f) Determine the taxable value payment rate by dividing the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 amount to be distributed under this subsection by the total statewide adjusted taxable value population as determined under subdivision (e). (g) Determine the taxable value payment for each county by multiplying the result under subdivision (f) by the adjusted taxable value populations for that county. Sec. 1206. A term that is defined in the Glenn Steil state revenue sharing act, 1971 PA 140, MCL 141.901 to 141.921, has the same meaning when used in sections 1202 to 1205. REPEALERS Sec. 1301. Sections 949f, 952, 954, 955, and 993 of article 5 of 2024 PA 121 are repealed. Sec. 1302. Section 1028 of article 9 of 2024 PA 121 is repealed. Sec. 1303. Section 232 of article 14 of 2024 PA 121 is repealed. Sec. 1304. Section 1201 of article 13 of 2024 PA 121 is repealed. Sec. 1305. Section 1102 of article 11 of 2024 PA 121 is repealed.